Tennessee, session 114, HB1555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-199(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the third and fourth sentences and substituting instead:
A person violating this section is subject to court costs and state and local litigation
taxes.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to violations occurring on or after such date.
HB1555
010053
- 1 -